en: thread-fin bream
ar: عندق
bg: Тънкопери каракуди
fi: viiriahven
fr: cohana
he: נימי
hr: thread-fin bream

en: Nemipterus spp
it: nemipterus spp

en: sablefish, black cod
la: Anoplopoma fimbria

en: scup, porgy, scuppaug
la: Stenotomus chrysops

en: sheepshead
la: Archosargus probatocephalus

en: spot, spot croaker
la: Leiostomus xanthurus

en: tilapia
xx: tilapia
de: Tilapia
hr: tilapija

en: farmed tilapia, farm raised tilapia
de: Tilapia aus Aquakultur
it: tilapia d'allevamento

en: tilapia fillet
de: Tilapiafilet
fr: filet de tilapia
hr: file tilapije
it: filetto di tilapia

en: blue tilapia
la: Oreochromis aureus

en: Mozambique tilapia
de: Buntbarsch aus Mosambik
hr: mozambička tilapija
it: tilapia del Mozambico
la: Oreochromis mossambicus

en: Nile tilapia
it: tilapia del Nilo
la: Oreochromis niloticus

en: blackline tilefish
la: Caulolatilus cyanops

en: blueline tilefish
la: Caulolatilus microps

en: golden tilefish
la: Lopholatilus chamaeleonticeps

en: tuna, tuna fish
af: Tuna
ar: تن
bg: Тунец, риба тон
ca: tonyina
da: Tunfisk
de: Thunfisch
eo: Tinuso
es: atún
eu: Atun
fa: ماگورو
fi: tonnikala, aitotonnikalat
fr: thon
ga: tuinnín
gl: Túnido
he: טונה
hr: tuna, tunj, tunjevina
ht: Ton
hu: tonhal
io: Atuno
is: Túnfiskur
it: tonno
ja: マグロ
ka: თინუსი
ko: 다랑어속
mk: Туна
nl: tonijn
pl: Tuńczyki, tuńczyk
pt: atum
qu: Atun challwa
ro: Ton
ru: тунцы, тунец
sh: Tunj
sr: Туна, tuna
sv: tonfisk
th: ปลาทูน่า
tr: orkinos
uk: тунець
ur: ٹیونا
zh: 鮪魚, 吞拿魚

en: Raw tuna
fr: Thon cru
it: tonno crudo

en: Canned tuna
bg: Консерви риба тон
de: Thunfischkonserve
es: Atun en conserva
fi: purkitetut tonnikalat
fr: Thon en conserve, thons en conserve
he: טונה בקופסה, טונה בקופסא, שימורי טונה
hr: konzervirana tuna
it: Tonno in scatola, tonni in scatola
nl: Tonijn in blik/pot
pt: Atuns em lata
ro: Conserve de ton
ru: Консервы из тунца, Консервы тунцовые

en: Tuna in brine, tunas in brine
bg: Риба тон в собствен сос
de: Thunfische im eigenen Saft
es: Atún al natural
fi: tonnikalaa vedessä
fr: Thon au naturel, thons au naturel, conserves de thon au naturel, conserve de thon au naturel
hr: tuna u salamuri
it: Tonno al naturale
nl: Tonijn natuur

en: Tuna in oil, Tunas in oil, Canned tuna in oil, Canned tunas in oil
bg: Риба тон в олио
de: Thunfische in Öl
es: Atún en aceite
fi: Tonnikalat öljyssä
fr: Thon à l’huile, Thons à l'huile, Thon à l'huile appertisé, Thon à l'huile en conserve
he: טונה בשמן
hr: tuna u ulju
it: Tonno sott'olio, tonni sott'olio
nl: Tonijn op olie
pt: Atun em óleo
ru: Консервированный тунец в масле